Hawaii statutes.
§414D-274 Change of name by foreign
corporation. (a) Whenever the name of a foreign corporation that is
authorized to transact business in this State is changed by an amendment to its
articles of incorporation, the foreign corporation, within sixty days after the
amendment becomes effective, shall deliver to the department director a
certificate evidencing the name change that is duly authenticated by the proper
officer of the state or country under the laws of which it is incorporated. If
the certificate is in a foreign language, a translation attested to under oath
by the translator shall accompany the certificate.

(b) Whenever a foreign corporation that is
authorized to transact business in this State changes its name to one that is
substantially identical to the name of any business entity or trade name
registered in this State, the foreign corporation shall not thereafter transact
any business in this State until it has changed its name to a name that is
available to it under the laws of this State or has otherwise complied with
this chapter.

(c) If a foreign corporation is unable to
change its name to a name that is available to it under the laws of this State,
it may deliver to the department director a copy of a certificate of
registration of a different name as a trade name and thereafter shall become
authorized to transact business in the State under that name. [L 2001, c 105,
pt of §1; am L 2003, c 124, §36]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next